Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.15
Commercial hazardous waste management facility; application for permit.

At the conclusion of the process involving the committee, the person desiring a permit for a commercial hazardous waste management facility shall make application therefor to the director on a form provided by the director. The application shall contain the name and residence of the applicant, the location of the proposed facility, and such other information as may be necessary and shall be accompanied by a copy of the committee's report and any written response by the applicant to such report.

Laws 1980, LB 853, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-1521.01;

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 9.